Utah statutes.
3-1-15.   Officers.
The board shall elect a president, a secretary and a treasurer, and may elect
one or more vice-presidents, and such other officers as may be authorized in
the bylaws. Unless the articles otherwise specifically provide, the president
and at least one of the vice-presidents must be directors, but a vice-
president who is not a director cannot succeed to or fill the office of
president. Any two of the offices of vice-president, secretary and treasurer
may be combined in one person.
